District of Columbia statutes.
22-407

Threats to do bodily harm.

Whoever is convicted in the District of threats to do bodily harm shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 6 months, or both, and, in addition thereto, or in lieu thereof, may be required to give bond to keep the peace for a period not exceeding 1 year.

July 16, 1912, 37 Stat. 193, ch. 235, § 2
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 98, ch. 159, § 212
Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 618, Pub. L. 88-241, § 11(b)
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 203(b), 60 DCR 2064
Firearms control, registration certificates, prerequisites for issuance, see § 7-2502.02.
This section is referenced in § 5-132.21, § 7-2502.03, § 16-4205, and § 22-951.
1981 Ed., § 22-507.
1973 Ed., § 22-507.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $500”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 203(b) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.